Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-8,114
Grants; eligibility.

(1) A teacher may apply to the department for a grant. The department shall not prioritize a grant based upon the school where the applicant teaches.

(2) A teacher is eligible to apply for:

(a) A retention one grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's second complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27;

(b) A retention two grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's fourth complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27;

(c) A retention three grant of two thousand five hundred dollars if the teacher has signed a contract to complete such teacher's sixth complete school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska school in school year 2023-24, 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27; and

(d)(i) A high-need retention grant of five thousand dollars if on or after June 2, 2023, a teacher:

(A) Obtains an endorsement in special education, mathematics, science, or technology and signs a contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a teacher to teach in such endorsement area at a Nebraska school in school year 2024-25, 2025-26, or 2026-27; or

(B) Signs a contract to complete a school year of full-time employment as a teacher at a Nebraska school in school year 2026-27 and teaches at least one dual enrollment course during such school year.

(ii) A teacher shall only be eligible to receive one high-need retention grant.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 46;

Laws 2024, LB1284, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 11.
July 18, 2026January 1, 2028